Tennessee statutes. Title 44 Animals And Animal Husbandry
Part 4

Certification of Livestock

44-7-401. Certification of quality — Fees — Rules and regulations.

In order to promote and further develop livestock interests of this state, the commissioner, or the commissioner's authorized agents, is authorized, when requested by parties financially interested in livestock or livestock products, to investigate and certify the quality, condition, grade or other classification of the livestock or livestock products. Such classification, including payment of such fees as the commissioner deems reasonable for the services rendered or performed by employees or licensed agents of the department, shall be established under such rules and regulations as the commissioner may prescribe.

Acts 1971, ch. 172, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 44-2501, 44-13-101.

Cross-References. Brands and trade-marks of timber, §43-28-311.

Annual license fee for distributors of commercial fertilizers, §43-11-104.

Registration of products, registered brands, §43-8-104.

44-7-402. Disposition of collected fees.

All fees and moneys collected or received under §44-7-401 shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the department, with the funds to be used solely and separately to defray the actual costs of the services rendered.

Acts 1971, ch. 172, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 44-2502, 44-13-102.

44-7-403. Animal diagnostic laboratory — Fees.

Animal diagnostic laboratory service fees, including, but not limited to, biopsy, necropsy, cytology, parasitology, virology, bacteriology, toxicology, and immunology, shall be set by rule pursuant to § 43-1-703.

The commissioner shall establish grading fees for livestock graded by employees or agents of the department of agriculture by rule pursuant to § 43-1-703. The livestock market where the animal was graded and sold shall be responsible for payment of the fees to the department.

Acts 1983, ch. 153, § 1; T.C.A., §44-13-103; Acts 1996, ch. 792, § 1; 2002, ch. 640, § 17; 2010, ch. 717, § 19; 2015, ch. 485, § 20.

Amendments. The 2010 amendment inserted “who belong to Tennessee residents,” in the first sentence of (a).

The 2015 amendment rewrote the section, which read: “(a) The commissioner is authorized to charge fees for services provided by the animal diagnostic laboratory pursuant to regulations promulgated by the commissioner; however, no fee will be charged for tests performed on livestock who belong to Tennessee residents, except for serologic testing for equine infectious anemia. For purposes of this part, “livestock” means all equine as well as animals that are being raised primarily for use as food or fiber for human utilization or consumption including, but not limited to, cattle, sheep, swine, goats and poultry.“(b) A grading fee of six cents (6cent(s)) per head shall be charged by the commissioner for feeder pigs and market hogs graded by employees or agents of the department. A minimum charge of thirty-seven dollars and fifty cents ($37.50) per day of sale shall be charged. The livestock market where the animal was graded and sold will be responsible for payment of the fees to the department.“(c) A grading fee of twenty-five cents (25cent(s)) per head will be charged by the commissioner for feeder calves graded by employees or agents of the department. A minimum charge of fifty dollars ($50.00) per day of sale shall be charged. The livestock market where the animal was graded and sold will be responsible for payment of the fees to the department.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 21. June 30, 2010.

Acts 2015, ch. 485, § 41. July 1, 2015; May 20, 2015, for the purpose of promulgating rules.